isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
razgleděti se/EX
děvec/EY
povinen/EZ
jegov/Ea
jejin/Ea
cicky/Eb
dolžen/EZ
bliznečky/Eb
dvojka/Ec
izzov/Ed
ljuty/Ee
marec/Ef
odprěti se/Eg
ov/Ea
podpirany od/Eh
prisežny/Ei
srědnje/Ej
tresti se/Ek
učeny/Ei
vugol/El
vgleděti se/EX
zapisati se/Em
trojka/Ec
zloty/Ee
nastrojky/Eb
poddany/Ei
raznesti se/Ek
oprěti se/Eg
sprěti se/Eg
narěčeny/Ei
svinec/Ef
znajemy/Ei
vozrastly/Ei
dorastly/Ei
odnesti se/Ek
kol/El
ljuby/Ei
pozov/Ed
zov/Ed
mnogonožky/Eb
členistonogy/Ei
redovy/Ei
vezti se/Ek
mekkotěly/Ei
oseljenec/EY
sanky/Eb
prigleděti se/EX
lukostrělec/EY
afrikanec/EY
